Wyoming statutes. Title 6 Crimes and Offenses
Chapter 3 Offenses Against Property

Cross references. —

For constitutional provision that no person shall be imprisoned for debt except in cases of fraud, see art. 1, § 5, Wyo. Const.

As to limitation of action for relief on ground of fraud, see §

1-3-106

.

As to survival of causes of action for any deceit or fraud, see §

1-4-101

.

As to forging or exhibiting forged permit with reference to transporting animals and poultry by vehicle, see §

11-21-104

.

As to prohibition against fraudulent practices in securities sales and purchases, see §

17-4-101

.

As to prohibition against fraudulent practices in securities advisory activities, see §

17-4-102

.

As to false statements in documents or proceedings before the secretary of state under the Uniform Securities Act, see § 17-4-116.

As to rights where partnership dissolved for fraud or misrepresentation, see §

17-21-603

.

As to recount of ballots in election where candidate alleges fraud or error, see §

22-16-110

.

As to obtaining unemployment compensation benefits by fraud, see §

27-3-702

.

As to forgery of certificate of title to motor vehicle, see §

31-4-102

.

As to forging notice under the Motor Vehicle Safety-Responsibility Act, see §

31-9-106

.

As to filing forged or fictitious diploma, certificate, license, etc., in connection with practice of veterinarian medicine, see §

33-30-101

.

As to the Uniform Fraudulent Conveyances Act, see §§

34-14-201

et seq..

As to penalty for fraudulent negotiation in commercial transactions, see §

34-16-106

.

As to unauthorized signatures under the Uniform Commercial Code, see § 34.1-3-403.

As to alteration of signatures under the Uniform Commercial Code, see § 34.1-4-207.

As to counterfeit substance under the Controlled Substances Act, see §

35-7-1002

.

For penalty as to unlawful manufacture, delivery or possession of a counterfeit substance under the Controlled Substances Act, see §

35-7-1031

.

As to acquiring substance by misrepresentation or furnishing false or fraudulent information under the Controlled Substances Act, see §

35-7-1033

.

As to cancellation of leases of state lands for fraud, see §

36-5-113

.

As to false or fraudulent representations in registering a trademark with the secretary of state, see §

40-1-110

.

As to civil liability of one who counterfeits another's trademark, see §

40-1-111

.

For authority to bring injunction against fraudulent or unconscionable conduct under the Wyoming Uniform Consumer Credit Code, see §

40-14-611

.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Admissibility of photographs of stolen property, 94 ALR3d 357.

Applicability of best evidence rule to proof of ownership of allegedly stolen personal property in prosecution for theft, 94 ALR3d 824.